Washington statutes.
RCW 43.20.240

Public water systems—Complaint process.

(1) The department shall have primary responsibility among state agencies to receive complaints from persons aggrieved by the failure of a public water system. If the remedy to the complaint is not within the jurisdiction of the department, the department shall refer the complaint to the state or local agency that has the appropriate jurisdiction. The department shall take such steps as are necessary to inform other state agencies of their primary responsibility for such complaints and the implementing procedures.

(2) Each county shall designate a contact person to the department for the purpose of receiving and following up on complaint referrals that are within county jurisdiction. In the absence of any such designation, the county health officer shall be responsible for performing this function.

(3) The department and each county shall establish procedures for providing a reasonable response to complaints received from persons aggrieved by the failure of a public water system.

(4) The department and each county shall use all reasonable efforts to assist customers of public water systems in obtaining a dependable supply of water at all times. The availability of resources and the public health significance of the complaint shall be considered when determining what constitutes a reasonable effort.

(5) The department shall, in consultation with local governments, water utilities, water-sewer districts, public utility districts, and other interested parties, develop a booklet or other single document that will provide to members of the public the following information:

(a) A summary of state and local law regarding the obligations of public water systems in providing drinking water supplies to their customers;

(b) A summary of the activities, including planning, rate setting, and compliance, that are to be performed by both local and state agencies;

(c) The rights of customers of public water systems, including identification of agencies or offices to which they may address the most common complaints regarding the failures or inadequacies of public water systems.

This booklet or document shall be available to members of the public no later than January 1, 1991.

[ 2009 c 495 s 2; 1999 c 153 s 56; 1990 c 132 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 495: See note following RCW 43.20.050.

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.

Legislative findings—1990 c 132: "The legislature finds the best interests of the citizens of the state are served if:

(1) Customers served by public water systems are assured of an adequate quantity and quality of water supply at reasonable rates;

(2) There is improved coordination between state agencies engaged in water system planning and public health regulation and local governments responsible for land use planning and public health and safety; and

(3) Existing procedures and processes for water system planning are strengthened and fully implemented by state agencies, local government, and public water systems." [ 1990 c 132 s 1.]

Severability—1990 c 132: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1990 c 132 s 7.]